District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.25

Meetings of shareholders — Place; annual and special; right to vote.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 190, ch. 269, § 25
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.25.
1981 Ed., § 29-325.
1973 Ed., § 29-910.